Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3699.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2024, chapter 116, article 3, section 53, is amended to read: Sec. 53. STATE PARK LICENSE PLATE DESIGN CONTEST. The commissioner of natural resources must hold a license plate design contest to design a new state park license plate available under Minnesota Statutes, section 168.1295, subdivision 1.new text begin The license plate design must:new text end new text begin (1) celebrate the North Shore and the Lake Superior Agate; new text end new text begin (2) not be created in whole or in part using artificial intelligence; new text end new text begin (3) be created by a resident of Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (4) be selected no later than December 18, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end